Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.355

Conversion of partnership to limited partnership.

(1) A partnership may be converted to a limited partnership pursuant to this section.

(2) The terms and conditions of a conversion of a partnership to a limited partnership must be approved by all of the partners or by a number or percentage specified for conversion in the partnership agreement.

(3) After the conversion is approved by the partners, the partnership shall file a certificate of limited partnership in the jurisdiction in which the limited partnership is to be formed. The certificate must include:

(a) A statement that the partnership was converted to a limited partnership from a partnership;

(b) Its former name; and

(c) A statement of the number of votes cast by the partners for and against the conversion and, if the vote is less than unanimous, the number or percentage required to approve the conversion under the partnership agreement.

(4) If the partnership was converted to a domestic limited partnership, the certificate must also include:

(a) The name of the limited partnership;

(b) The address of the office for records and the name and address of the registered agent for service of process designated in accordance with Article 4 of chapter 23.95 RCW;

(c) The name and the geographical and mailing address of each general partner;

(d) The latest date upon which the limited partnership is to dissolve; and

(e) Any other matters the general partners determine to include therein.

(5) The conversion takes effect when the certificate of limited partnership is filed or at any later date specified in the certificate in accordance with RCW 23.95.210.

(6) A general partner who becomes a limited partner as a result of the conversion remains liable as a general partner for an obligation incurred by the partnership before the conversion takes effect. If the other party to a transaction with the limited partnership reasonably believes when entering the transaction that the limited partner is a general partner, the limited partner is liable for an obligation incurred by the limited partnership within ninety days after the conversion takes effect. The limited partner's liability for all other obligations of the limited partnership incurred after the conversion takes effect is that of a limited partner as provided in the Washington uniform limited partnership act.

[ 2015 c 176 s 5105; 2009 c 188 s 1405; 1998 c 103 s 902.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—2009 c 188: See note following RCW 23B.13.020.